District of Columbia statutes.
42-3610

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor shall issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved. Nothing in this section shall affect any requirements imposed upon the Mayor by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

(b)

The Mayor may issue emergency rules without prior Council approval, which shall be effective for not more than 120 days.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1311, 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1311 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1311 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
Resolution 16-614, the “Residential Drug-Related Evictions Regulations Approval Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective April 18, 2006.